src/morphology/stems/noun.lexc
LEXICON N_PERKEET
!!€gt-norm: Noun  jeat plurt
!!€ perkeet: perkeet+N+Pl+Nom fish scales and guts
!!$ perje: perkeet+N+Sg+Nom
0:kee   N_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:je       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:kee     N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ke      N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:ke      N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_POJAT
!!€gt-norm: Noun pojat plurt
!!€ pojat: pojat+N+Pl+Nom # boys
!!$ poika: pojat+N+Sg+Nom
0:ja    N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT   ;
0:ik   N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:j   N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:ik   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:ik   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:ika   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:ik   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:ika   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ja   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ik   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:ika   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;


! Note: The lexica from here and down were found
! missing on 31.12.13. First I assumed there were
! some occational holes, and I made the first two
! based upon the corresponding singular ones.
! Then I saw there were over 100 lexica missing, and
! I just added them as empty lexica. 

! I suspect there is a file or a major update missing
! here, so look into this. Trond.

LEXICON N_KYNNET
0:ne N_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0:s N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:s N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:s N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:t N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:s N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:s   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:t   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_VARPAAT
0:pa N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0:pa N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:pa N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:pa N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:pa N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:pa N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:pa N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:pa   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:pa   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_INGET
#;

LEXICON N_JUOVAT
#;

LEXICON N_JYLKYT
#;

LEXICON N_KAARRET
#;

LEXICON N_KIRITTÄRET
#;

LEXICON N_HAIT
#;

LEXICON N_KORTET
#;

LEXICON N_KENTÄT
#;

LEXICON N_ROMPAAT
#;

LEXICON N_LANNET
#;


LEXICON N_LIPOTTARET
#;

LEXICON None
#;

LEXICON N_LOUET
#;

LEXICON N_LUODES
#;

LEXICON N_LÄHDES
#;

LEXICON N_LÄHDET
#;

LEXICON N_MURTEET
#;

LEXICON N_MERTU
#;

LEXICON N_NIMETÖIN
#;

LEXICON N_HÄRKIN
#;

LEXICON N_MATEE
#;

LEXICON N_KYLÄNVANHIN
#;

LEXICON N_YMPÄRYSTÄ
#;

LEXICON N_PÖLHÄÄT
#;

LEXICON N_MATKUET
#;

LEXICON N_ALTIS
#;

LEXICON N_RINNET
#;

LEXICON N_MÄNNYT
#;

LEXICON N_RUOPPAAT
#;

LEXICON N_KAARET
#;

LEXICON N_HÄMET
#;

LEXICON N_PÖLLÖT
#;

LEXICON N_HYÖTYY
#;

LEXICON N_KANKAHAT
#;

LEXICON N_SAMMALET
#;

LEXICON N_PEIPOT
#;

LEXICON N_MÄTTÄÄT
#;

LEXICON N_LAET
#;

LEXICON N_RANGAT
#;

LEXICON N_KYNNÄÄT
#;

LEXICON N_EKKE
#;

LEXICON N_SILMÄKKEET
#;

LEXICON N_SIUNAAMATTOMAT
#;

LEXICON N_METTE
#;

LEXICON N_LINGOT
#;

LEXICON N_VELJET
#;

LEXICON N_SÄÄRET
#;

LEXICON N_PANKIT
#;

LEXICON N_LUHDAT
#;

LEXICON N_RIIPI
#;

LEXICON N_SELENE
#;

LEXICON N_FÄNRIKIT
#;

LEXICON N_KLUMPIT
#;

LEXICON N_TYÖTTÖMÄT
#;

LEXICON N_RÄMIÄT
#;

LEXICON N_TÖLPÄT
#;

LEXICON N_LAHDET
#;

LEXICON N_SYLI
#;

LEXICON N_RÄMEET
#;

LEXICON N_AINOA
#;

LEXICON N_ONNET
#;

LEXICON N_KALATOIN
#;

LEXICON N_HÄNNÄT
#;

LEXICON N_KORVET
#;

LEXICON N_RAPPE
#;

LEXICON N_LAMMET
#;

LEXICON N_KOUVOT
#;

LEXICON N_MIEHET
#;

LEXICON N_KAARROT
#;

LEXICON N_RÄMEÄT
#;

LEXICON N_VIIRRET
#;

LEXICON N_RIMMIT
#;

LEXICON N_TEHTAAT
#;

LEXICON N_EUGENE
#;

LEXICON N_SELJÄT
#;

LEXICON N_AHDET
#;

LEXICON N_HALPA
#;

LEXICON N_JÄRJESTÖT
#;

LEXICON N_JÄRVITAHDON
#;

LEXICON N_KANAALI
#;

LEXICON N_KARRAT
#;

LEXICON N_KASTILJAT
#;

LEXICON N_KITARA
#;

LEXICON N_KORTES
#;

LEXICON N_KORTTI
#;

LEXICON N_KUMMUT
#;

LEXICON N_KUNNAT
#;

LEXICON N_KYDÖT
#;

LEXICON N_KÄRJET
#;

LEXICON N_LAMMI
#;

LEXICON N_LAMMIT
#;

LEXICON N_LENTTEE
#;

LEXICON N_LOMMOL
#;

LEXICON N_LUODE
#;

LEXICON N_LUOLIKOT
#;

LEXICON N_MÄET
#;

LEXICON N_NIEMET
#;

LEXICON N_NIITUT
#;

LEXICON N_NIITYT
#;

LEXICON N_OSOITE
#;

LEXICON N_RANNAT
#;

LEXICON N_REIÄT
#;

LEXICON N_RIIVET
#;

LEXICON N_RIMMI
#;

LEXICON N_RINTEET
#;

LEXICON N_RIUTAT
#;

LEXICON N_ROITOT
#;

LEXICON N_SAARET
#;

LEXICON N_SALONTEET
#;

LEXICON N_SUOT
#;

LEXICON N_SÄRKÄT
#;

LEXICON N_TIIVIS
#;

LEXICON N_TOKEE
#;

LEXICON N_TYÖ
#;

LEXICON N_TÖLPÄKÖT
#;

LEXICON N_VUOLLET
#;

LEXICON N_VÄRTÖ
#;

LEXICON N_YHTIÖT
#;

LEXICON N_YLÖÖ
#;

LEXICON N_YRITTÄ
#;


LEXICON N_BACK_ILLATIVE_HYN
#;

LEXICON N_BACK_ILLATIVE_HÖN
#;














! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

LEXICON  N
beringinhylkeet+N:beringinhyl N_PERKEET  ;
kaksospojat+N:kaksos#po N_POJAT  ;
kalanperkeet+N:kalan#per N_PERKEET  ;
kolmospojat+N:kolmos#po N_POJAT ;
